Massachusetts, session 194th, H4129.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 7A of chapter 90 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking out, in lines 39 and 40, the words “and exhaust
system” and inserting in place thereof the following words:- , exhaust system and muffler.
SECTION 2. Section 16 of said chapter 90, as so appearing, is here by amended by
adding the following paragraph:-
The registrar shall establish rules and regulations providing for the inspection of mufflers
pursuant to the first paragraph during a periodic staggered inspection of all motor vehicles
established in section 7A. If a muffler fails to pass the inspection the vehicle shall receive a
certificate of rejection windshield sticker indicating that the vehicle had failed its inspection. The
registrar shall establish fines for mufflers that fail to pass inspection.
of 1